Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5318
Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund; Land Acquisition and Source Water Loan Fund; Drinking Water Administration Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund is created. The fund shall be held as a trust fund for the purposes and uses described in the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act.

The fund shall consist of federal capitalization grants, state matching appropriations, proceeds of state match bond issues credited to the fund, repayments of principal and interest on loans, transfers made pursuant to section 71-5327, and other money designated for the fund. The director may make loans from the fund pursuant to the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act and may conduct activities related to financial administration of the fund, administration or provision of technical assistance through public water system source water assessment programs, and implementation of a source water petition program under the Safe Drinking Water Act. The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, except that any bond proceeds in the fund shall be invested in accordance with the terms of the documents under which the bonds are issued. The state investment officer may direct that the bond proceeds shall be deposited with the bond trustee for investment. Investment earnings shall be credited to the fund.

The department may create or direct the creation of accounts within the fund as the department determines to be appropriate and useful in administering the fund and in providing for the security, investment, and repayment of bonds.

The fund and the assets thereof may be used, to the extent permitted by the Safe Drinking Water Act and the regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act, to (a) pay or to secure the payment of bonds and the interest thereon, except that amounts deposited into the fund from state appropriations and the earnings on such appropriations may not be used to pay or to secure the payment of bonds or the interest thereon, and (b) buy or refinance the debt obligation of any municipality for a public water supply system if the debt was incurred and construction began after July 1, 1993.

The director may transfer any money in the Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund to the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund to meet the purposes of section 71-5327. The director shall identify any such transfer in the intended use plan presented to the council for annual review and adoption pursuant to section 71-5321.

(2) The Land Acquisition and Source Water Loan Fund is created. The fund shall be held as a trust for the purposes and uses described in the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act.

The fund shall consist of federal capitalization grants, state matching appropriations, proceeds of state match bond issues credited to the fund, repayments of principal and interest on loans, and other money designated for the fund. The director may make loans from the fund pursuant to the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act and may conduct activities other than the making of loans permitted under section 1452(k) of the Safe Drinking Water Act. The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, except that any bond proceeds in the fund shall be invested in accordance with the terms of the documents under which the bonds are issued. The state investment officer may direct that the bond proceeds shall be deposited with the bond trustee for investment. Investment earnings shall be credited to the fund.

The department may create or direct the creation of accounts within the fund as the department determines to be appropriate and useful in administering the fund and in providing for security, investment, and repayment of bonds.

The fund and assets thereof may be used, to the extent permitted by the Safe Drinking Water Act and the regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act, to pay or secure the payment of bonds and the interest thereon, except that amounts credited to the fund from state appropriations and the earnings on such appropriations may not be used to pay or to secure the payment of bonds or the interest thereon.

The director may transfer any money in the Land Acquisition and Source Water Loan Fund to the Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund.

(3) There is hereby created the Drinking Water Administration Fund. Any funds available for administering loans or fees collected pursuant to the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to such fund. The fund shall be administered by the department for the purposes of the act. The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Prior to July 1, 2026, investment earnings shall be credited to the fund. Beginning July 1, 2026, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

The Drinking Water Administration Fund and assets thereof may be used, to the extent permitted by the Safe Drinking Water Act and the regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act, to fund subdivisions (9), (11), and (12) of section 71-5322. The annual obligation of the state pursuant to subdivisions (9) and (12) of section 71-5322 shall not exceed sixty-five percent of the revenue from administrative fees collected pursuant to section 71-5321 in the prior fiscal year.

The director may transfer any money in the Drinking Water Administration Fund to the Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund to meet the state matching appropriation requirements of any applicable federal capitalization grants or to meet the purposes of subdivision (9) of section 71-5322.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 46;

Laws 2007, LB80, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 620;

Laws 2019, LB307, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB809, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB880, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 164.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.